District of Columbia statutes.
51-134

Employee awareness training.

(a)

Within 180 days of June 19, 2004, and pursuant to § 51-113, the Director shall institute a program for the training and development of employees who have been designated by the Director to make the initial determination whether benefits may be payable to a claimant. The training shall focus on the nature of domestic violence, with the goal of increasing employee awareness of its ramifications on unemployment, and on the procedure for handling claims based on domestic violence. The training shall seek to ensure that employees who interact with claimants have the knowledge necessary to handle domestic violence claims and the skills to provide equitable treatment to all claimants.

(b)

The training shall be offered annually. Persons newly hired or assigned to make the initial determination whether benefits may be payable shall attend the next available training subsequent to their hire or assignment.

History

Aug. 28, 1935, ch. 794, § 34
as added June 19, 2004, D.C. Law 15-171, § 2(b), 51 DCR 4701